Tennessee, session 114, HB2660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 270 of the Private Acts of 1982, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting SECTION 1 and substituting:
SECTION 1. A severance tax is hereby levied in Weakley County on sand,
gravel, clay, and all other minerals that are severed from the earth for private
commercial purposes. However, the tax shall not be levied on any mineral taxed under
the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Sections 67-7-101 through 67-7-110. The
measure of the tax shall be twenty cents (20¢) per ton on all minerals severed from the
ground in Weakley County that are subject to the tax levied by this act. The owner shall
become liable for payment of the severance tax at the time the mineral is severed from
the earth and transported from the mine. The tax is levied upon the severance of the
mineral regardless of the place of processing or sale of the mineral or the fact that
delivery may be made outside the county. The tax shall accrue at the time the sand,
gravel, clay or other mineral is severed from the earth and in its natural or unprocessed
state and transported from the mine. The tax levied shall be a lien upon all subject
minerals severed in the county and any other property owned by the miner. Such lien
shall be entitled to preference over all judgments, encumbrances, or liens whatsoever
created.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Weakley County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
HB2660
014438
- 1 -

SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
- 2 - 014438